Utah statutes.
53C-5-104.   Fees.
(1)  The director shall collect a fee annually from each grazing permittee for
the control of noxious weeds, new and invading plant species, insects, and
disease infestations on trust rangelands.
(2)  The fee shall be 10 cents per animal unit month (AUM).
(3)  Fees collected by the director under this section shall be deposited in
the Land Grant Management Fund created in Section 53C-3-101 and shall be used
by the director for the payment of costs incurred in controlling noxious
weeds, new and invading plant species, insects, and disease infestations on
school and institutional trust lands.
